Missouri, session 2026, HB2296.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.1280, to read as follows:
376.1280. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Acute pain", pain that results from disease, accidental or intentional
trauma, or other causes, that a health care provider reasonably expects to last thirty
days or fewer;
(2) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(3) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(4) "Health care professional", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when a licensed health
care professional acting within the scope of his or her license prescribes a nonopioid
medication for the treatment of acute pain to an enrollee, it shall be unlawful for a
health benefit plan to:
(1) Deny coverage of the nonopioid prescription drug in favor of an opioid
prescription drug;
(2) Require the enrollee to try an opioid prescription drug before providing
coverage of the nonopioid prescription drug; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2296 2
(3) Require a higher level of cost-sharing for the nonopioid prescription drug
than for an opioid prescription drug.
3. This section shall apply to health benefit plans delivered, issued for delivery,
continued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027.
✔